src/fst/morphology/stems/fao-acronyms.lexc
! ========= !
!! # Akronymer
! ========= !

!! This documents the `stems/fao-acronyms.lexc` file.
!! Most acronyms are taken from a common generated file, this file is for the Faroese-specific acronyms.

LEXICON Acronym-fao
 !!= **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pointing to the lexica
  Akronymnumeralier ; !!≈ * @CODE@ (Nogle tal først, måskje?)
  Acronym-fao-list  ; !!≈ * @CODE@

LEXICON Acronym-fao-list
 !!= **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for selve listen, i øjeblikket 2:
 StÍF ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@
 T5PC ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@
   TB ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@
   VB ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@
  NSÍ ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@
   GÍ ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@
   ÍF ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@
   KÍ ACRO ; !!≈ * @CODE@

LEXICON Akronymnumeralier
 !!= **@LEXNAME@**  for 0-9
 %0 anl ;
  1 anl ;
  2 anl ;
  3 anl ;
  4 anl ;
  5 anl ;
  6 anl ;
  7 anl ;
  8 anl ;
  9 anl ;

LEXICON anl ! akronymloop
 !!= **@LEXNAME@**  send numvers too letterloops -- this might be too liberal.
     Akronymnumeralier ; ! loop
     FIRSTLETTER       ; ! Over til bogstaverne
 :%- FIRSTLETTER       ; ! ... med stræg først
